District of Columbia statutes.
19-1307.08

Compensation of trustee.

(a)

If the terms of a trust do not specify the trustee’s compensation, a trustee is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances.

(b)

If the terms of a trust specify the trustee’s compensation, the trustee is entitled to be compensated as specified, but the court may allow more or less compensation if:

(1)

The duties of the trustee are substantially different from those contemplated when the trust was created; or

(2)

The compensation specified by the terms of the trust would be unreasonably low or high.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
This section is referenced in § 19-1301.05.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 708 of the Uniform Trust Code.